Indiana, session 2026, SB191.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 32-21-2.5-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.26-2022,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) As used in this section, "paper document"
or "paper documents" means a tangible record that is received by a
county recorder in a form that is not electronic.
(b) On or before July 1, 2022, A county recorder shall receive for
recording, indexing, storage, archiving, access to, searching of,
retrieval, and transmittal all electronic documents proper for recording.
A county recorder shall also accept electronically any fee or tax that the
county recorder is authorized to collect under applicable laws. A
county recorder shall implement the processing of electronic
documents proper for recording in compliance with:
(1) this article;
(2) IC 33-42;
(3) IC 36-2-7.5;
(4) IC 36-2-11; and
(5) IC 36-2-13; and
and the standards adopted by the electronic recording commission
created under section 9 of this chapter.
(c) This section does not apply to the following documents:
(1) A military discharge under IC 10-17-2.
(2) A survey of real property.
SEA 191

2
(3) A plat of real property.
(4) A document containing the identifying information of a
participant in the address confidentiality program under
IC 5-26.5.
(d) A recorder who accepts electronic documents for recording
shall:
(1) continue to accept paper documents as authorized by state
law; and
(2) place entries for paper documents and electronic documents
in the same index.
(e) A recorder who accepts electronic documents for recording may:
(1) convert paper documents accepted for recording into
electronic form;
(2) convert into electronic form information recorded before the
county recorder began to accept and index electronic documents;
or
(3) agree with other officials of a state or a political subdivision
of a state, or of the United States, on procedures or processes to
facilitate the electronic satisfaction of prior approvals and
conditions precedent to recording and the electronic payment of
fees and taxes.
SEA 191

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 191